Nevada, session 83, AB379.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the College of Southern Nevada the sum of $1 for
the development of its Northwest Campus, including the Center for
Excellence in Public Safety.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
-
*AB379*

– 2 –
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB379*